Washington statutes.
RCW 19.83.030

Furnishing or selling trading stamps, coupons, or similar devices geographically limited.

No person shall furnish or sell to another for use, in, with, or for the sale of any goods, any trading stamps, coupons, tickets, certificates, cards, or other similar devices to be used in any county, city or town in this state other than that in which such furnishing or selling shall take place.

[ 1957 c 221 s 2. Prior: 1939 c 31 s 1, part; 1913 c 134 s 3, part; RRS s 8361, part. Formerly RCW 36.91.030.]